Washington statutes.
RCW 36.23.080

Office at county seat.

The clerk of the superior court shall keep an office at the county seat of the county of which he or she is clerk.

[ 2009 c 105 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.23.080. Prior: 1891 c 57 s 1; RRS s 73, part. Cf. Code 1881 s 2125.]